Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-320.13
Flood control; cities of the first class; project outside city limits; powers; authority.

All rights, powers, authority, and jurisdiction conferred on cities of the first class by sections 23-320.07 to 23-320.12, may be exercised by such city, in the absence of federal participation or sponsorship, whenever any project of flood control outside the limits of such city directly affects the welfare of such city and involves a cost of not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars.

Laws 1965, c. 93, § 1, p. 401.